Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-3308
Pipeline carrier; compliance with
federal and state laws; plant, seed, and mulch use.

(1) A pipeline carrier shall ensure that
all reclamation, including, but not limited to, choice of seed mixes, method
of reseeding, and weed and erosion control measures and monitoring, is conducted
in accordance with the Federal Seed Act, 7 U.S.C. 1551 et seq., the Nebraska
Seed Law, and the Noxious Weed Control Act.

(2) A pipeline carrier shall
ensure that genetically appropriate and locally adapted native plant materials
and seeds are used based on site characteristics and surrounding vegetation
as determined by a preconstruction site inventory.

(3) A pipeline carrier shall ensure
that mulch is installed as required by site contours, seeding methods, or
weather conditions or when requested by a landowner.

Laws 2012, LB845, § 5.

Nebraska Seed Law, see section 81-2,147.

Noxious Weed Control Act, see section 2-945.01.